Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 243 Alcoholic Beverages — Licenses and Taxes

243.010.
Definitions for chapter and for KRS 243.720 to 243.850. [Repealed.]

243.015.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in KRS

241.010

have the meaning given to them in KRS

241.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 435, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.